Rhode Island statutes. Title 7 Corporations, Associations, and Partnerships
Part 15 Reports and Records

7-1.2-1501.
Annual reports of domestic and foreign corporations.

Each domestic corporation, and each foreign corporation authorized to transact business in this state, shall file, within the time prescribed by this chapter, an annual report stating:

The name of the corporation and the state or country under the laws of which it is incorporated;

A brief statement of the character of the business in which the corporation is actually engaged in this state;

The names and respective addresses of the directors and officers of the corporation;

[Deleted by P.L. 2021, ch. 137, § 1 and P.L. 2021, ch. 138, § 1.]

A statement of the aggregate number of issued shares, itemized by classes, par value of shares, if any, and series, if any, within a class; and

Any additional information that is required by the secretary of state.

The annual report must be made on forms prescribed and furnished by the secretary of state, and the information contained therein must be given as of the date of the execution of the report. It must be executed on behalf of the corporation by its authorized representative, or, if the corporation is in the hands of a receiver or trustee, it must be executed on behalf of the corporation by the receiver or trustee.

The annual report of a domestic or foreign corporation must be delivered to the secretary of state between February 1 and May 1 of each year, except that the first annual report of a domestic or foreign corporation must be filed between February 1 and May 1 of the year following the calendar year in which its articles of incorporation were filed with or its certificate of authority was issued by the secretary of state. Proof to the satisfaction of the secretary of state that prior to May 1 the report was deposited in the United States mail in a sealed envelope, properly addressed, with postage prepaid, is deemed to be a compliance with this requirement.

If the secretary of state finds that the annual report conforms to the requirements of this chapter, the secretary of state shall file the report. If the secretary of state finds that it does not conform, the secretary of state shall promptly return the report to the corporation for any necessary corrections, in which event the penalties subsequently prescribed for failure to file the report within the time previously provided do not apply if the report is corrected to conform to the requirements of this chapter and returned to the secretary of state within thirty (30) days from the date on which it was mailed to the corporation by the secretary of state.

Each corporation, domestic or foreign, that fails or refuses to file its annual report for any year within thirty (30) days after the time prescribed by this chapter is subject to a penalty of twenty-five dollars ($25.00) per year.

History of Section.

P.L. 2004, ch. 216, § 2; P.L. 2004, ch. 274, § 2; P.L. 2005, ch. 120, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 130, § 1; P.L. 2021, ch. 137, § 1, effective January 1, 2022; P.L. 2021, ch. 138, § 1, effective January 1, 2022.

7-1.2-1502.
Books and records.

Each corporation shall keep correct and complete books and records of account, keep minutes of the proceedings of its shareholders and of the board of directors and committees of the board, and shall also keep at its registered office or principal place of business, legal counsel’s office, or at the office of its transfer agent or registrar, a record of its shareholders giving the names and addresses of all shareholders and the number and class of the shares held by each. Any books, records, and minutes may be in written form or any other form capable of being converted into written form within a reasonable time.

Any director, shareholder or holder of voting trust certificates for shares of a corporation, upon written demand stating the purpose for the demand, has the right to examine, in person, or by agent or attorney, at any reasonable time or times, for any proper purpose, its relevant books and records of account, minutes, and record of shareholders and to make extracts from those books and records of account, minutes, and record of shareholders.

Any officer or agent who, or a corporation which, refuses to allow any shareholder or holder of voting trust certificates, or his or her agent or attorney, to examine and make extracts from its books and records of account, minutes, and record of shareholders, for any proper purpose, is liable to the shareholder or holder of voting trust certificates in a penalty of ten percent (10%) of the value of the shares owned by the shareholder, or in respect of which the voting trust certificates are issued, in addition to any other damages or remedy afforded him or her by law. It is a defense to any action for penalties under this section that the person bringing the suit has within two (2) years sold or offered for sale any list of shareholders or of holders of voting trust certificates for shares of the corporation or any other corporation or has aided or abetted any person in procuring any list of shareholders or of holders of voting trust certificates for that purpose, or has improperly used any information secured through any prior examination of the books and records of account, or minutes, or record of shareholders, or of holders of voting trust certificates for shares of the corporation or any other corporation, or was not acting in good faith or for a proper purpose in making his or her demand.

Nothing contained in these provisions impairs the power of any court of competent jurisdiction, upon proof by a director, shareholder or holder of voting trust certificates of proper purpose, to compel the production for examination by the director, shareholder or holder of voting trust certificates of the books and records of account, minutes, and record of shareholders of a corporation.

Upon the written request of any director, shareholder or holder of voting trust certificates for shares of a corporation, the corporation shall mail to the director, shareholder or holder of voting trust certificates its most recent financial statements showing in reasonable detail its assets and liabilities and the results of its operations.

History of Section.

P.L. 2004, ch. 216, § 2; P.L. 2004, ch. 274, § 2; P.L. 2005, ch. 120, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 130, § 1.